District of Columbia statutes.
29-1204.05

Claims pertaining to a series.

(a)

A series of a statutory trust may not sue or be sued in its own name.

(b)

If a series trust has a claim against a person which pertains to the property of a series thereof, the trust may assert the claim under § 29-1203.08 and shall allocate the proceeds of the claim under §§ 29-1204.01 and 29-1204.02.

(c)

If a person has a claim against a series trust which pertains to the property of a series thereof, to assert the claim the person must bring the claim against the trust, stating that the claim pertains to the property of a series thereof and specifying the series if known. To the extent the claim succeeds and is reduced to judgment:

(1)

The judgment must state that it is collectable only against the property of the specified series; and

(2)

The judgment creditor may levy on the judgment only by serving the series trust, which shall satisfy the judgment by using only the property of the specified series.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(5)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.